Louisiana, session 2026, HB1061.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:808(A)(12) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§808. Eligibility in group programs
A. For the purposes of participating in life, health, or other programs
sponsored by the Office of Group Benefits, an employee is defined as:
* * *
(12) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a retired
employee who meets all of the following criteria:
(a) Prior to retirement, the retiree participated in the Office of Group
Benefits as an employee pursuant to any provision of Paragraphs (1) through (11) of
this Subsection for at least one year.
(b) The retiree's aggregated years of participation in Office of Group
Benefits plans between participation as an employee and as a spouse of an employee
are greater than or equal to twenty years.
(c) After retirement, the retiree experiences a qualifying life event that
triggers conditions for special enrollment pursuant to 29 CFR 2590.701-6.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective January 1, 2027.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1978 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1061